Tennessee, session 114, SB2439.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. The comptroller of the treasury is urged to study the feasibility and
potential impacts of establishing the value of all residential property as the most recent price
paid for the property in lieu of assessors of property appraising the value through the use of
assessment manuals. If such study is conducted, then the comptroller shall submit a report,
including any findings and recommendations, to the finance, ways and means committee of the
senate and the committee of the house of representatives having jurisdiction over finance
matters.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2439
012552
- 1 -